Maine, session 132, LD2131.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill proposes to establish a system to maintain and increase access to nursing home
services statewide and to develop strategies to recruit and retain a workforce for nursing
homes.
Page 1 - 132LR2932(01)